Hawaii statutes.
[§201B-8.5] Revenue bonds for conservation
easement in Turtle Bay, Oahu. (a) As authorized by section 6 of Act 81,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2014, the authority shall issue revenue bonds to acquire
a conservation easement in Turtle Bay, Oahu. The public shall have perpetual
public access to said conservation easement. The conservation easement shall
be in compliance with chapter 198.

Prior to executing the agreement to acquire the
conservation easement, the authority shall:

(1) Obtain an appraisal and perform its due diligence
on the conservation easement and property rights proposed to be acquired; and

(2) Offer to hold an informational briefing for the
legislature. The offer shall be made through the president of the senate and
speaker of the house of representatives.

(b) For the purpose of this section, the
authority shall be deemed a "department" and the acquisition of the
conservation easement shall be deemed an "undertaking" under chapter
39.

(c) The revenue bonds issued to acquire the
conservation easement shall be secured by and payable from the transient
accommodations tax revenues allocated to the Turtle Bay conservation easement
special fund established pursuant to section 201B-8.6. For this purpose, the
revenues allocated shall be deemed "user taxes" for the undertaking.

(d) The revenue bonds shall be issued in
accordance with chapter 39, part III. The authority shall request the director
of finance, on behalf of the authority, to perform the duties specified under
section 39-68 regarding the preparation, sale, and administration of the
revenue bonds. [L 2014, c 81, pt of §2]

Note

L 2014, c 81 not severable. L 2014, c 81, §8.

Debt restructuring requirement. L 2014, c 81, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next